src/import/nouns.lexc
vabadussõjalane+N:vabadus#sõjalane OLULINE ;
vabadusvõitleja+N:vabadus#v´õitleja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabadusvõitlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vabadus#v´õitlus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabakaubandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#kaubandus OLULINE ;
vabakaubanduslepe+N:vaba#kaubandus#l´epP1e PINGE ;
vabakaubandusleping+N:vaba#kaubandus#leping VIRSIK ;
vabakiri+N:vaba#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vabaksandmine+N:vabaks#´andmine SUULINE ;
vabakslaskmine+N:vabaks#l´askmine SUULINE ;
vabakslastu+N:vabaks#l´astu AASTA ;
vabakuulaja+N:vaba#k´uulaja AASTA ;
vabalöök+N:vaba#l´öök TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabameelsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#m´eelsus SUULINE ;
vabamüük+N:vaba#m´üük TAUD ;
vabamüürlane+N:vaba#m´üürlane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabamüürlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#m´üürlus SUULINE ;
vabandamine+N:vabandamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vabandus OLULINE ;
vabanduskiri+N:vabandus#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vabanemine+N:vabanemine OLULINE ;
vabanenu+N:vabanenu AASTA ;
vabariik+N:vaba#r´iik TAUD ;
vabariiklane+N:vaba#r´iiklane SUULINE ;
vabarn+N:vabarn MAGUS ;
vabasadam+N:vaba#sadam MAGUS ;
vabastaja+N:vabastaja AASTA ;
vabastamine+N:vabastamine OLULINE ;
vabastatu+N:vabastatu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabastatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vabastatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vabastus OLULINE ;
vabasurm+N:vaba#s´urm%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
vabasõit+N:vaba#s´õit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabatahtlikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#t´ahtl´ikkus OLULINE ;
vabatehnika+N:vaba#tehnika AASTA ;
vabatmees+N:vabat#me MEES ;
vabatsoon+N:vaba#ts´oon TAUD ;
vabaturg+N:vaba#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabaturumajandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#turu#majandus OLULINE ;
vabaujumine+N:vaba#ujumine OLULINE ;
vabavärss+N:vaba#v´ärss TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabaõhuetendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaba#õhu#etendus OLULINE ;
vabaõhukontsert+N:vaba#õhu#k´onts´ert TAUD ;
vabaõhumuuseum+N:vaba#õhu#m´uuseum MUUSEUM ;
vabe+N:vabe PERE ;
vabin+N:vabin MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vabrik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vabrikant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v`abrik´an,t TAUD ;
vada+N:vada KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vadak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vadak VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vademeekum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vadem´eekum REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vader+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vader REDEL ;
vaderileping+N:vaderi#leping VIRSIK ;
vadi+N:vad,i KAVA ;
vadin+N:vadin MAGUS ;
vadjalane+N:vad,jalane OLULINE ;
vadjalanna+N:vad,jalanna PERE ;
vaeglane+N:v´aeglane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaegtoitumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aeg#t´oitumus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaegus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aegus SUULINE ;
vaekauss+N:v´ae#k´auss TAUD ;
vaekoda+N:v´ae#koJ1D1a%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vaen+N:v´aen%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaene+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aene SOOLANE ;
vaenelaps+N:v´aene#l´aP1s LAPS ;
vaenlane+N:v´aenlane SUULINE ;
vaenuaeg+N:vaenu#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaenulikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v`aenul´ikkus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaenus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aenus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaenutegevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaenu#tegevus OLULINE ;
vaenutsemine+N:vaenutsemine OLULINE ;
vaenuvahekord+N:vaenu#vahe#k´orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vaenuväli+N:vaenu#v´äl,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaeras+N:v´aera KOTKAS ;
vaeseke+N:v´aeseke PEENIKE ;
vaesekene+N:v´aesekene OLULINE ;
vaeslaps+N:v´aes#l´aP1s LAPS ;
vaeslastekodu+N:v´aes#laste#kodu KAVA ;
vaestemaja+N:v´aeste#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaesus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aesus SUULINE ;
vaev+N:v´aev%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevalisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaevalisus OLULINE ;
vaevapalk+N:vaeva#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaevatasu+N:vaeva#tasu KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´aevus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagabund+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v`agab´und TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagadus OLULINE ;
vagajutt+N:vaga#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vag´ant TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagatsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagatsus OLULINE ;
vagel+N:v´aK2E2l%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vagiina+N:vagiina PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaginiit+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagin´iit TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagonett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagon´et,t TAUD ;
vagu+N:vaG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vagulane+N:vagulane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagumus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagun+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagun REDEL ;
vaguniaken+N:vaguni#´akkE2n PIPAR ;
vaguniesik+N:vaguni#esik VIRSIK ;
vagunisaatja+N:vaguni#s´aatja AASTA ;
vagunitäis+N:vaguni#t´äiS1%{stemill%} VARS ;
vaguniuks+N:vaguni#´uK1s LAPS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagurus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagurus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vagusus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vagusus OLULINE ;
vaha+N:vaha KAVA ;
vahakuju+N:vaha#kuju KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahaküpsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaha#k´üpsus SUULINE ;
vahariie+N:vaha#r´iiD1e%{stemill%} PINGE ;
vahe+N:vahe PERE ;
vaheaeg+N:vahe#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vaheaste+N:vahe#´astE2 HAARE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahedus OLULINE ;
vaheetapp+N:vahe#et´app TAUD ;
vahejaam+N:vahe#j´aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vahejuhtum+N:vahe#j´uhtum REDEL ;
vahekasu+N:vahe#kasu KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahekaugus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe#k´augus SUULINE ;
vahekohtunik+N:vahe#k´ohtun´ik ELANIK ;
vahekohus+N:vahe#k´ohT1u KOHUS ;
vahekokkuvõte+N:vahe#k´okku#v´õtT1e PINGE ;
vahekord+N:vahe#k´orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vahekäik+N:vahe#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
vahelagi+N:vahe#laG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
vaheldi+N:vaheldi AASTA ;
vaheldumine+N:vaheldumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldumus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldusrikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vaheldus#r´ikkus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduvus OLULINE ;
vahelejätt+N:vahele#j´ätt%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
vahelejäämine+N:vahele#j´äämine SUULINE ;
vahelesegamine+N:vahele#segamine OLULINE ;
vaheletrügija+N:vahele#trügija AASTA ;
vahelihas+N:vahe#lihas SOOLANE ;
vahelik+N:v`ahel´ik ELANIK ;
vaheltkasu+N:vahelt#kasu KAVA ;
vahelugemine+N:vahe#lugemine OLULINE ;
vahelugu+N:vahe#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vahemaa+N:vahe#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
vahemaandumine+N:vahe#m´aandumine OLULINE ;
vahemees+N:vahe#me MEES ;
vahemik+N:v`ahem´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahemärgistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe#märgistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahend REDEL ;
vahendaja+N:vahendaja AASTA ;
vahendamine+N:vahendamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahenditus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahenditus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahendus OLULINE ;
vahendusfirma+N:vahendus#firma PERE ;
vahendustasu+N:vahendus#tasu KAVA ;
vahepala+N:vahe#pala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
vaheplatvorm+N:vahe#pl´atv´orm TAUD ;
vaher+N:vahT1E2r VAHER ;
vaheraha+N:vahe#raha KAVA ;
vaherahu+N:vahe#rahu KAVA ;
vaheruum+N:vahe#r´uum RUUM ;
vahesein+N:vahe#s´ein%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
vahetalitaja+N:vahe#talitaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahetalitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahe#talitus OLULINE ;
vahetamine+N:vahetamine OLULINE ;
vahetumine+N:vahetumine OLULINE ;
vahetund+N:vahe#t´unD1 TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahetus OLULINE ;
vahetuskaup+N:vahetus#k´aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
vahetuskurss+N:vahetus#k´urss TAUD ;
vahetusmängija+N:vahetus#m´ängija AASTA ;
vahetusraha+N:vahetus#raha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahhabiit+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahhab´iit TAUD ;
vahialune+N:vahi#alune SOOLANE ;
vahikord+N:vahi#k´orD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
vahimadrus+N:vahi#madrus SOOLANE ;
vahimaja+N:vahi#maja%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
vahimees+N:vahi#me MEES ;
vahipost+N:vahi#p´os,t TAUD ;
vahiputka+N:vahi#put,ka PERE ;
vahistamine+N:vahistamine OLULINE ;
vahistatu+N:vahistatu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahistatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahistatus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@vahistus OLULINE ;
vahisõdur+N:vahi#sõdur REDEL ;
vahitorn+N:vahi#t´orn TAUD ;
vahižurnaal+N:vahi#žurn´aal TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ahK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
vahkviha+N:v´ahk#viha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ahT1 TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vaht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ahT1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
vahtimine+N:v´ahtimine OLULINE ;
vahtkond+N:v´ahtk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
vahtkondlane+N:v´ahtk´ondlane SUULINE ;
vahtkonnaruum+N:v´ahtkonna#r´uum RUUM ;
vahtkonnaülem+N:v´ahtkonna#ülem MAGUS ;
vahtraleht+N:v´ahtra#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
vahtramets+N:v´ahtra#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vahtrik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@v´ahtr´ik ÄMBLIK ;
